Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-152.01
Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court; judges; judicial nominating commission; selection.

The members of the judicial nominating commission for the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court shall be selected on a statewide basis as provided in section 24-803.

Laws 1967, c. 292, § 4, p. 798;

Laws 1973, LB 110, § 11;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 80.